Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2202
Legislative findings and intent.

The Legislature finds that safe and modern highway infrastructure is of great importance to Nebraska's residents, agricultural economy, business economy, and future economic growth. Furthermore, the Legislature finds that it is in the interest of Nebraska taxpayers to leverage interest rates to offset the challenges that construction inflation and uncertain federal highway funding pose to adequately financing the state's infrastructure needs. It is the intent of the Legislature to conservatively utilize bond financing by issuing bonds, not to exceed four hundred fifty million dollars in principal and thirty-five million dollars in annual debt service for a period of not more than nineteen years, in order to accelerate completion of the highway construction projects identified and to be identified for funding under the Build Nebraska Act.

Laws 2023, LB727, § 29.

Build Nebraska Act, see section 39-2701.